Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-7608
Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund is created. The fund shall include any settlement payments or other revenue received by the State of Nebraska in connection with any tobacco-related litigation to which the State of Nebraska is a party. The Department of Health and Human Services shall remit such revenue to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund.

(2) Subject to the terms and conditions of such litigation, money from the Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund shall be transferred to the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund as provided in section 71-7611 or, until June 30, 2027, to the Nebraska Transformational Project Fund.

(3) Any money in the Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1070, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 324, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1427, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 1436, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 16;

Laws 2003, LB 412, § 6;

Laws 2004, LB 1091, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 678;

Laws 2008, LB606, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 32;

Laws 2008, LB961, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB316, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 151.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.